Illinois, session 104th, SB3747.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Good Samaritan Act is amended by adding 5Section 6 as follows: 6    (745 ILCS 49/6 new)7    Sec. 6. Medical services rendered without compensation; 8exemption from civil liability. 9    (a) For purposes of this Section:10    "Licensed health care provider" means an individual or 11entity duly licensed or legally authorized to provide medical 12services. "Licensed health care provider" includes a health 13care professional who maintains a volunteer license pursuant 14to Section 2105-17 of the Professional Regulation Law of the 15Civil Administrative Code of Illinois.16    "Medical services" means health care services or products 17rendered by a licensed health care provider within the scope 18of the licensed health care provider's license or legal 19authorization. "Medical services" includes, but is not limited 20to, hospital, medical, surgical, dental, vision, and 21pharmaceutical services or products.22    (b) A licensed health care provider who renders medical 23services voluntarily and without compensation or the   SB3747- 2 -LRB104 15149 BAB 28293 b1expectation or promise of compensation and does not seek 2reimbursement from charitable or governmental sources is not 3liable for any civil damages for any act or omission resulting 4from the rendering of the services unless the act or omission 5was the result of the licensed health care provider's gross 6negligence or willful misconduct. The agreement to provide a 7voluntary, noncompensated service must be made in writing 8before rendering service in the case of a nonemergency and may 9be evidenced by the licensed health care provider's giving 10notice, in writing to the patient or to the person responsible 11for the patient's care and acting for the patient, that the 12service being rendered is voluntary and without compensation. 13Notice and consent may be given through the use of an 14electronic medical record device.